Massachusetts, session 194th, H2875.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 46H the following section:-
SECTION 46H1/2. Consolidated Sick Leave Bank Procedures
(a) All state agencies shall establish rules and procedures to be used by employees who
have contributed to the Sick Leave Bank. Each agency may decide to permit sick leave bank
donations to be made on an as needed basis.
(b) The following provisions must be included in the rules and regulations adopted by the
state agencies:
1. The agencies must review the sick leave utilization of any member of the Sick Leave
Bank who applies for sick leave from the bank. Sick leave will not be granted to an applicant
with evidence of prior sick leave abuse in his or her personnel file or attendance record.
of 2

2. The agencies must require adequate evidence of illness or injury, which is not job-
related, of an employee only (not any family member).
3. An employee who applies to the Sick Leave Bank must have used all available accrued
and accumulated leave including vacation and personal leave.
(c) Any unused sick leave remaining in the Sick Leave Bank on December 31 shall be
reverted to the contributor, provided that totals shall not exceed 25 days.
(d) Nothing contained herein shall affect current collective bargaining agreements
relative to the establishment of sick leave bank policies.
of 2